Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2899.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 20, chapter 4, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-841.14, to read: START_STATUTE20-841.14. Prosthetic device; coverage A. A hospital service corporation or medical service corporation that issues, amends, delivers or renews a subscription contract on or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for a prosthetic device. B. A subscription contract shall cover: 1. A prosthetic device that meets the medical needs of a subscriber as determined by the subscriber's treating health care provider. 2. An additional prosthetic device or prosthetic devices if the subscriber's treating health care provider determines that the additional prosthetic device or prosthetic devices are necessary to enable the subscriber to engage in physical and recreational activities, including: (a) Running. (b) Bicycling. (c) Swimming. (d) Climbing. (e) Skiing. (f) Snowboarding. (g) Team or individual sports.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 20, chapter 4, article 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1057.21, to read: START_STATUTE20-1057.21. Prosthetic device; coverage A. A health care services organization that issues, amends, delivers or renews an evidence of coverage On or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for a prosthetic device. B. An evidence of coverage shall cover: 1. A prosthetic device that meets the medical needs of an enrollee as determined by the enrollee's treating health care provider. 2. An additional prosthetic device or prosthetic devices if the enrollee's treating health care provider determines that the additional prosthetic device or prosthetic devices are necessary to enable the enrollee to engage in physical and recreational activities, including: (a) Running. (b) Bicycling. (c) Swimming. (d) Climbing. (e) Skiing. (f) Snowboarding. (g) Team or individual sports.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 20, chapter 6, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1376.11, to read: START_STATUTE20-1376.11. Prosthetic devices; coverage A. A disability insurer that issues, amends, delivers or renews a policy On or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for a prosthetic device. B. The policy shall cover: 1. A prosthetic device that meets the medical needs of an insured as determined by the insured's treating health care provider. 2. An additional prosthetic device or prosthetic devices if the insured's treating health care provider determines that the additional prosthetic device or prosthetic devices are necessary to enable the insured to engage in physical and recreational activities, including: (a) Running. (b) Bicycling. (c) Swimming. (d) Climbing. (e) Skiing. (f) Snowboarding. (g) Team or individual sports.END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 20, chapter 6, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1406.11, to read: START_STATUTE20-1406.11. Prosthetic devices; coverage A. A group or blanket disability insurer that issues, amends, delivers or renews a policy On or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for a prosthetic device. B. A policy shall cover: 1. A prosthetic device that meets the medical needs of an insured as determined by the insured's treating health care provider. 2. An additional prosthetic device or prosthetic devices if the insured's treating health care provider determines that the additional prosthetic device or prosthetic devices are necessary to enable the insured to engage in physical and recreational activities, including: (a) Running. (b) Bicycling. (c) Swimming. (d) Climbing. (e) Skiing. (f) Snowboarding. (g) Team or individual sports.END_STATUTE